verbo/espanol_verbo_pret_indef.foma
define PretIndefIndYo1 [a r "$"] -> {é} || _ 1;
define PretIndefIndTu1 [a r "$"] -> {aste} || _ 2;
define PretIndefIndElla1 [a r "$"] ->  {ó}   || _ 3;
define PretIndefIndNos1 [a r "$"] -> {amos} || _ 4;
define PretIndefIndVos1 [a r "$"] -> {asteis} || _ 5;
define PretIndefIndUst1 [a r "$"] -> {aron} || _ 6;

define PretIndefIndYo2 [e r "$"] -> {í} || _ 1;
define PretIndefIndTu2 [e r "$"] -> {iste} || _ 2;
define PretIndefIndElla2 [e r "$"] -> {ió} || _ 3;
define PretIndefIndNos2 [e r "$"] -> {imos} || _ 4;
define PretIndefIndVos2 [e r "$"] -> {isteis} || _ 5;
define PretIndefIndUst2 [e r "$"] -> {ieron} || _ 6;

define PretIndefIndYo3 [i r "$"] -> {í} || _ 1;
define PretIndefIndTu3 [i r "$"] -> {iste} || _ 2;
define PretIndefIndElla3 [i r "$"] -> {ió} || _ 3;
define PretIndefIndNos3 [i r "$"] -> {imos} || _ 4;
define PretIndefIndVos3 [i r "$"] -> {isteis} || _ 5;
define PretIndefIndUst3 [i r "$"] -> {ieron} || _ 6;

define PretIndefInd1 PretIndefIndYo1 .o. PretIndefIndTu1 .o. PretIndefIndElla1 .o. PretIndefIndNos1 .o. PretIndefIndVos1 .o. PretIndefIndUst1;
define PretIndefInd2 PretIndefIndYo2 .o. PretIndefIndTu2 .o. PretIndefIndElla2 .o. PretIndefIndNos2 .o. PretIndefIndVos2 .o. PretIndefIndUst2;
define PretIndefInd3 PretIndefIndYo3 .o. PretIndefIndTu3 .o. PretIndefIndElla3 .o. PretIndefIndNos3 .o. PretIndefIndVos3 .o. PretIndefIndUst3;

define PretIndefInd PretIndefInd1 .o. PretIndefInd2 .o. PretIndefInd3;
